Montana, session 2025, HB620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 28-2-724, MCA, is amended to read:
"28-2-724. Prohibition of contracts that restrict practice -- applicability -- exceptions. (1) A
contract that creates or establishes the terms of employment, a partnership, or any other form of professional
relationship with a health care provider described in subsection (2), may not restrict the right of the health care
provider to:
(a) practice or provide services for which the provider is licensed, in any geographic area and for
any period, after the termination of the employment, partnership, or other form of professional relationship;
(b) treat, advise, consult with, or establish a provider-patient relationship with any current patient of
the employer or with a patient affiliated with a partnership or other form of professional relationship; or
(c) solicit or seek to establish a provider-patient relationship with any current patient of the
employer or with a patient affiliated with a partnership or other form of professional relationship.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1) apply to contracts or agreements involving the following
health care providers:
(a) a psychiatrist or addiction medicine physician licensed under Title 37, chapter 3;
(b) a psychologist licensed under Title 37, chapter 17;
(c) a social worker licensed under Title 37, chapter 22;
(d) a professional counselor licensed under Title 37, chapter 23;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 620
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 620
(e) an addiction counselor licensed under Title 37, chapter 35;
(f) a marriage and family therapist licensed under Title 37, chapter 37; and
(g) a behavioral health peer support specialist licensed under Title 37, chapter 38.
(3) This section does not apply to a contract in connection with the sale and purchase of a practice
or to a provision for repayment of all or a portion of money paid or advanced to a physician licensed under Title
37, chapter 3, that is subject to a payback provision that decreases over time, including but not limited to a
bona fide loan, relocation cost, signing bonus, education expense, and tuition repayment expense."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.
Section 3. Applicability. [This act] applies to contracts made or renewed on or after January 1,
2026.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 620
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 620, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 620
INTRODUCED BY S. GIST, N. NICOL, G. OBLANDER, S. ESSMANN
AN ACT REVISING LAWS PROHIBITING CONTRACTS THAT RESTRICT PRACTICE TO INCLUDE
LICENSED PHYSICIANS OF ALL SPECIALTIES; PROVIDING EXCEPTIONS; AMENDING SECTION 28-2-724,
MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE A DELAYED EFFECTIVE DATE AND AN APPLICABILITY DATE.”